Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1010.
do enact as follows:SB1010,11Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB1010,2,112(1) Requirement to compile and share state SNAP data. As soon as 3possible, but no later than 6 months after the effective date of this subsection, the 4department of health services shall compile and share with the federal food and 5nutrition service of the department of agriculture all data required by the federal 6department of agriculture as set forth in the federal department of agriculture’s 7letter to state agency directors dated July 23, 2025, which is intended to implement 8the March 20, 2025, executive order 14243 issued by the president of the United 9States regarding individuals who, since January 1, 2020, have received, are 10currently receiving, or have applied to receive benefits under the federal food stamp 11program under s. 49.79.SB1010,2,1212